Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2619.04
Visitor's evaluation report; responses.

The petitioner and the proposed ward shall have ten judicial days to file responses to the visitor's evaluation report.

Laws 1982, LB 428, § 5.